Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.240

Dismissal of information or indictment after probation completed—Vacation of conviction.

(1) Every defendant who has fulfilled the conditions of his or her probation for the entire period thereof, or who shall have been discharged from probation prior to the termination of the period thereof, may at any time prior to the expiration of the maximum period of punishment for the offense for which he or she has been convicted be permitted in the discretion of the court to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and enter a plea of not guilty, or if he or she has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court may in its discretion set aside the verdict of guilty; and in either case, the court may thereupon dismiss the information or indictment against such defendant, who shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense or crime of which he or she has been convicted. The probationer shall be informed of this right in his or her probation papers: PROVIDED, That in any subsequent prosecution, for any other offense, such prior conviction may be pleaded and proved, and shall have the same effect as if probation had not been granted, or the information or indictment dismissed.

(2)(a) After the period of probation has expired, the defendant may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the defendant's record of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The court may, in its discretion, clear the record of conviction if it finds the defendant has met the equivalent of the tests in RCW 9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be applied to a person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984.

(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement agencies.

(3) This section does not apply to chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 2008 c 134 s 27; 2003 c 66 s 1; 1957 c 227 s 7. Prior: 1939 c 125 s 1, part; RRS s 10249-5e.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.

Severability—1939 c 125: See note following RCW 9.95.200.

Gambling commission—Denial, suspension, or revocation of license, permit—Other provisions not applicable: RCW 9.46.075.

Juvenile courts, probation officers: RCW 13.04.040, 13.04.050.

State lottery commission—Denial, suspension, and revocation of licenses—Other provisions not applicable: RCW 67.70.090.